Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-365.11
Sewerage systems and sewage disposal plants; terms, defined; powers construed.

The terms sewage system, sewerage system, including storm sewer system, and disposal plant or plants, as used in sections 14-365.01 to 14-365.13 mean and include any system or works above or below ground which has for its purpose any or all of the following: The removal, discharge, conduction, carrying, treatment, purification, or disposal of the liquid and solid waste of a city of the metropolitan class, surface waters, and storm waters. The powers conferred by sections 14-365.01 to 14-365.13 may also be employed in connection with sewage and sewer projects which do not include the erection or enlargement of a sewage disposal plant.

Laws 1953, c. 24, § 11, p. 103;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 77.
July 21, 2022